COMMENT ON TROUBLE SYMPTOM
  • Failure is possibly caused by failed ignition circuit, failed fuel feed or other faults.
PROBABLE CAUSE
  • Failed battery
  • Timing belt broken
  • Failed idle speed control
  • Throttle valve fouled around
  • Failed ignition system
  • Failed fuel system
  • Failed immobilizer system
  • Failed inhibitor-switch
  • Failed engine-A/T-ECU
STEP 2: Check engine warning lamp for burnt out bulb.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 3
.
NO:  Check engine-A/T-ECU power supply, engine control relay and ignition switch IG1 system (Refer to Inspection Procedure 24 ).
       
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES: 
  • Check intermediate connectors B-19, and repair if necessary. If intermediate connectors are normal, check and repair harness between B-22 (terminal No. 9) inhibitor switch connector and C-135 (terminal No. 51) engine-A/T-ECU connector.
    • Check output line for open/short circuit.
NO:  Repair.
STEP 9: MUT-II/III data list
    1. Item 22: Crank angle sensor
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 10 .
NO:  Check crank angle sensor system (Refer to Code No. P0335 ).
STEP 10: Check injector for operating sound.
Q: Can operating sound be heard?
YES:  Go to Step 11 .
NO: 
  • Check the injector system of the defective cylinder.
  • (Refer to Code No. P0201: No. 1 injector system .)
  • (Refer to Code No. P0202: No. 2 injector system .)
  • (Refer to Code No. P0203: No. 3 injector system .)
  • (Refer to Code No. P0204: No. 4 injector system .)
STEP 11: Check ignition coil spark.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 12
.
NO: 
  • Check ignition circuit system (Refer to Inspection Procedure 30)
STEP 12: Fuel pressure measurement.
Q: Is the check result normal?
YES:  Go to Step 13 .
NO:  Repair.
©2004 Mitsubishi Motors Corporation